Idaho, session 2026, S1349.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS AND INTENT. (1) The Legislature of the
State of Idaho finds that:
(a) The right of the people to keep and bear arms is a fundamental, indi-
vidual right that shall not be infringed;
(b) The Second Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and
Section 11, Article I of the Constitution of the State of Idaho protect
the right of law-abiding citizens to keep and bear arms commonly pos-
sessed for lawful purposes;
(c) Federal law currently restricts the manufacture, transfer, and
possession of certain machine guns pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 922(o); and
(d) If such federal restrictions are repealed, invalidated, or oth-
erwise rendered unenforceable, Idaho should immediately recognize and
protect the right of law-abiding citizens and Idaho-based industry to
lawfully possess, manufacture, transfer, and sell machine guns in this
state, subject only to otherwise applicable state law.
(2) It is the intent of the Legislature to:
(a) Establish a contingent, or "trigger," framework under which Idaho
law automatically authorizes the lawful possession, manufacture,
transfer, and sale of machine guns upon the repeal, invalidation, or
unenforceability of 18 U.S.C. 922(o) or any successor provision;
(b) Ensure that Idaho is positioned as a national leader in firearms
freedom and related industry when such federal restrictions cease to
apply; and
(c) Prohibit the use of state and local resources to enforce federal re-
strictions that are no longer valid or enforceable.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 33, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-3328, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-3328. MACHINE GUNS -- CONTINGENT AUTHORIZATION. (1) As used in this
section:


(a) "Machine gun" means any firearm that shoots, is designed to shoot,
or can be readily restored to shoot automatically more than one (1)
shot, without manual reloading, by a single function of the trigger.
(b) "Trigger event" means the first to occur of any of the following:
(i) The repeal by congress of 18 U.S.C. 922(o), or any successor
provision that restricts the possession, transfer, or manufacture
of machine guns by civilians;
(ii) A decision of the supreme court of the United States that
holds 18 U.S.C. 922(o), or any successor provision that restricts
the possession, transfer, or manufacture of machine guns by civil-
ians, unconstitutional in whole or in relevant part;
(iii) A decision of a federal court of competent jurisdiction that
is binding in the state of Idaho and that permanently enjoins the
enforcement of 18 U.S.C. 922(o), or any successor provision that
restricts the possession, transfer, or manufacture of machine
guns by civilians, within the state of Idaho, and such decision is
not stayed; or
(iv) Formal written notice by the attorney general of the state
of Idaho that the bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms and explo-
sives, or any successor agency, has ceased enforcing 18 U.S.C.
922(o), or any successor provision that restricts the posses-
sion, transfer, or manufacture of machine guns by civilians, as to
law-abiding civilians generally.
(2) Upon the occurrence of a trigger event, and subject to the provi-
sions of subsection (3) of this section:
(a) It shall be lawful under the laws of the state of Idaho for any
person who is not otherwise prohibited from possessing firearms under
state or federal law to possess, purchase, receive, sell, transfer, or
manufacture a machine gun in this state; and
(b) No state agency, political subdivision, or employee thereof shall
adopt or enforce any rule, regulation, ordinance, or policy that has the
purpose or effect of prohibiting or unduly burdening the lawful posses-
sion, purchase, receipt, sale, transfer, or manufacture of machine guns
as authorized by this section.
(3) Nothing in this section shall:
(a) Authorize the possession of a machine gun by a person who is prohib-
ited from possessing firearms under state or federal law;
(b) Affect the application of generally applicable criminal laws, in-
cluding but not limited to laws relating to the use of firearms in the
commission of a crime, reckless endangerment, or unlawful discharge of
a firearm; or
(c) Be construed to require any person or entity to manufacture, sell,
or transfer a machine gun.
(4) The attorney general shall, within thirty (30) days after determin-
ing that a trigger event has occurred, publish notice of such determination
on the official website of the attorney general and transmit such notice to:
(a) The governor;
(b) The president pro tempore of the senate;
(c) The speaker of the house of representatives; and
(d) The director of the Idaho state police.


(5) The provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be-
come operative on the thirtieth day following the date on which the attorney
general issues the notice described in subsection (4) of this section.
SECTION 3. That Chapter 33, Title 18, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 18-3329, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
18-3329. PROHIBITION ON ENFORCEMENT OF INVALID FEDERAL RESTRIC-
TIONS. (1) Upon the occurrence of a trigger event, as defined in section
18-3328, Idaho Code, no agency, political subdivision, or employee of the
state of Idaho, acting in an official capacity, shall:
(a) Expend any funds or use any personnel or other resources to enforce,
or to assist in the enforcement of, 18 U.S.C. 922(o), or any successor
provision that restricts the possession, transfer, or manufacture of
machine guns, as defined in section 18-3328, Idaho Code, by civilians,
to the extent such provision has been repealed, invalidated, or ren-
dered unenforceable as described in section 18-3328, Idaho Code; or
(b) Provide material support or resources to any federal agency or
official for the purpose of investigating, citing, or prosecuting any
person for conduct that is lawful pursuant to section 18-3328, Idaho
Code.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Prohibit cooperation or information-sharing relating to conduct
that remains unlawful under state or federal law; or
(b) Limit the authority of state or local law enforcement to investi-
gate or prosecute violations of state law.
SECTION 4. SEVERABILITY. The provisions of this act are hereby declared
to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such
provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason,
such declaration shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of
this act.
SECTION 5. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.